fr: Conception des coutures: Couture arrière; Couture standard; Sans couture; Autre
pl: Konstrukcja szwów: Szew z tyłu; Zwykły szew; Bezszwowy; Inny
sl-SI: Zasnova šiva: Šiv zadaj; Običajen šiv; Brezšivno; Drugo
sk-SK: Dizajn švu: Zadný šev; Bežný šev; Bezšvové; Iné
el: Σχεδιασμός ραφής: Πίσω ραφή; Κανονική ραφή; Χωρίς ραφές; Άλλο
es: Diseño de la costura: Costura trasera; Costura normal; Sin costuras; Otro
ro-RO: Designul cusăturii: Cusătură la spate; Cusătură obișnuită; Fără cusături; Altele
it: Design della cucitura: Cucitura posteriore; Cucitura regolare; Senza cuciture; Altro
zh-CN: 接缝设计: 后缝; 常规接缝; 无缝; 其他
ja: 縫い目デザイン: バックシーム; レギュラーシーム; シームレス; その他
th: การออกแบบตะเข็บ: ตะเข็บหลัง; ตะเข็บปกติ; ไร้รอยตะเข็บ; อื่นๆ
fi: Saumojen asettelu: Takasauma; Tavallinen sauma; Saumaton; Muu
sv: Utformning av söm: Baksöm; Vanlig söm; Sömlös; Övrigt
bg-BG: Дизайн на шева: Заден шев; Стандартен шев; Без шевове; Други
ru: Конструкция шва: Задний шов; Обычный шов; Бесшовный; Другое
zh-TW: 接縫設計: 背縫; 一般接縫; 無縫; 其他
hu: Öltésdizájn: Hátsó varrat; Normál varrat; Varrat nélküli; Egyéb
tr: Dikiş tasarımı: Arka dikiş; Normal dikiş; Dikişsiz; Diğer
nb: Sømdesign: Baksøm; Vanlig søm; Sømløs; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de costura: Costura traseira; Costura regular; Sem costura; Outros
de: Saumstil: Rückennaht; Reguläre Naht; Nahtlos; Sonstige
pt-PT: Design da costura: Costura traseira; Costura normal; Sem costuras; Outro
vi: Thiết kế đường may: Đường may sau; Đường may thông thường; Không đường may; Khác
nl: Naadontwerp: Achternaad; Standaardnaad; Naadloos; Overig
ko: 솔기 디자인: 백 심; 레귤러 심; 심리스; 기타
lt-LT: Siūlių dizainas: Nugaros siūlė; Įprasta siūlė; Besiūlė; Kita
hr-HR: Dizajn šava: Stražnji šav; Obični šav; Bez šavova; Ostalo
en: Seam design: Back seam; Regular seam; Seamless; Other
da: Sømdesign: Bagsøm; Almindelig søm; Sømløs; Andet
cs: Provedení švu: Zadní šev; Běžný šev; Bezešvé; Jiné